District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.30

Definitions.

As used in §§ 4-205.31 through 4-205.35, the term:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

“Lump-sum payment or settlement” means a nonrecurring earned or unearned income, including retroactive monthly benefits, and payments in the nature of a windfall. The phrase “lump-sum payment or settlement” does not include income that represents a correction of previous underpayments of TANF, POWER, Aid to Families with Dependent Children (representing payments owed before that program was repealed) or GAC, and does not include a personal injury award, worker’s compensation, or similar award to the extent that it is earmarked and used for the purpose for which it was paid, such as payment of medical bills.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 530, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(cc), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.30.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(cc) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(cc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(cc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(cc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(cc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).